District of Columbia statutes.
1-623.12

Maximum and minimum monthly compensation.

(a)

Except as provided by § 1-623.38, the monthly rate of compensation for disability, including augmented compensation under § 1-623.10, but not including additional compensation under § 1-623.11, may not be more than 75% of the monthly pay of the maximum rate of basic pay for GS-15 as provided in § 5332 of Title 5 of the United States Code or its equivalent as provided in subchapter XI of this chapter. In case of total disability and except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the monthly rate of compensation may not be less than 75% of the monthly pay of the minimum rate of basic pay for GS-2 as provided in § 5332 of Title 5 of the United States Code or its equivalent as provided in subchapter XI of this chapter, or the amount of the monthly pay of the employee, whichever is less.

(b)

For employees hired after December 31, 1979, who make a claim for compensation for disability or death after December 29, 1994, except as provided in § 1-623.38, the monthly rate of compensation for disability, including augmented compensation under § 1-623.10, but not including additional compensation under § 1-623.11, may not be more than 73% of the monthly pay of the maximum rate of basic pay for DS-12, Step 10. In the case of total disability the monthly rate of compensation may not be less than 75% of the monthly pay of the minimum rate of basic pay for DS-2, Step 1, or the amount of the monthly pay of the employee, whichever is less.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2312, 25 DCR 5740
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 810(e), 42 DCR 3684

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-623.38.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-624.12.
1973 Ed., § 1-353.12.